Hawaii statutes.
[§707-768] Firearms, explosives, and
dangerous weapons. Extortion in any degree is a class A felony when a
firearm, explosive, or any dangerous weapon is immediately available and is
physically used as part of the threat. [L 1979, c 106, pt of §1]

Cross References

Firearms; dangerous weapons, see §§134-1 and 134-51.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next